Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-536
Policy; requirements.

Such motor vehicle liability policy shall state the name and address of the named insured, the coverage afforded by the policy, the premium charged therefor, the policy period and the limits of liability, and shall contain an agreement or be endorsed that insurance is provided thereunder in accordance with the coverage defined in sections 60-501 to 60-569 as respects bodily injury and death or property damage, or both, and is subject to all the provisions of sections 60-501 to 60-569.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 36, p. 496.